dictionaries/da_DK/da_DK-2.5.024.dic
espartogræs/12,57
esrom/58,12
essayistik/58,12
eternit/58,12,32
eugenik/58,12
f/51
fantastik/58,12
farve-tv/51
farvel/12,57,32
faststoffysik/58,12,32
fattigdom/58,12
feldspat/58,12
festivitas/58,12
finmotorik/58,12
finsprit/58,12
fjerntrafik/58,12
flusspat/58,12
fnat/58,12
fnok/58,12
forkøbsret/58,12
forkørselsret/58,12
formskum/12,57
forret/58,12
fortrinsret/58,12
forældreret/58,12
fuldautomatik/58,12
fuldemandssnak/58,12
funkis/58,12,32
fup/12,57,32
fusionsmusik/58,12
førstefødselsret/58,12
førsteret/58,12
G/51
g/51
gallium/12,57,32
galmandssnak/58,12
gammelmandssnak/58,12
gennemtræk/58,12
genskin/12,57
geofysik/58,12,32
germanium/12,57,32
glas/12,57,32
gotik/58,12
grafit/58,12,32
gravøl/12,57
grovmotorik/58,12
guf/12,57
gymnastik/58,12,32
h/51
habengut/12,57
handelssamkvem/12,57
hankøn/12,57
harmonik/58,12
Harzen/54,11
havret/58,12
havstok/58,12
hdtv/51
helium/12,57,32
hepatitis/58,12,32
Hessen/54,11
himmelrum/12,57
hjernegymnastik/58,12
homiletik/58,12
Hubei/54,11
humangenetik/58,12
humbug/58,12
husblas/58,12
husrum/12,57
hvidblik/12,57
hvidløgssmør/12,57
hydraulik/58,12,32
hydrodynamik/58,12
hydromekanik/58,12
hydrostatik/58,12
højenergifysik/58,12,32
højhedsret/58,12
hør/58,12
I/51
i/51
indfødsret/58,12
indium/12,57
informatik/58,12,32
ir/58,12
Irak/54,11
Iran/54,11
iridium/12,57,32
isenkram/12,57,32
islæg/12,57
j/51
jackpot/58,12
jordsmon/12,57
journalistik/58,12
K/51
k/51
kabel-tv/51
kakaosmør/12,57
kalium/12,57,32
kandis/58,12,32
kanvas/12,57,32
kaos/12,57,32
karbolineum/12,57
karborundum/12,57
karburatorsprit/58,12
keramik/58,12,32
Kiel/54,11
kir/58,12
kit/12,57
klaret/58,12
klid/12,57,32
kloakslam/58,12
komik/58,12
konsensus/58,12,32
kontraststof/12,57,32
kosmos/12,57
kram/12,57
krap/58,12,32
krigsmateriel/12,57
kryddersmør/12,57
kryolit/58,12,32
krøl/12,57,32
kulstof/12,57,32
kvantum/12,57,62
kvartsit/12,57
kvælstof/12,57,32
købsret/58,12
l/51
lagerøl/12,57
landsskatteret/58,12
levvel/12,57
ligeløn/58,12
linoleum/12,57
lirekassemusik/58,12
litium/12,57,32
livsløn/58,12
lokal-tv/51
lokalkolorit/58,12
lokaltrafik/58,12
London/54,11
luksus/58,12,32
Luxemburg/54,11
lyrik/58,12,32
M/51
m/51
magnesit/58,12
magnesium/12,57,32
magnium/12,57
makrokosmos/12,57
Mallorca/54,11
mandfolkesnak/58,12
mandkøn/12,57
mandskøn/12,57
måneskin/12,57
marieglas/12,57,32
maskinel/12,57
mastik/58,12
materiel/12,57,32
Mecklenburg/54,11
medbestemmelsesret/58,12
melodik/58,12
memorandum/12,57,32
merskum/12,57
metaforik/58,12
mikroelektronik/58,12,32
mikrokosmos/12,57,32
mindsteløn/58,12
mini-tv/51
mon/12,57,32
morgengymnastik/58,12,32
moskus/58,12,32
motorik/58,12
musik/58,12,32
N/51
n/51
nationalromantik/58,12
natrium/12,57,32
naturkosmetik/58,12
naturkrøl/12,57
Nederland/54,11
neptunium/12,57
nid/12,57,32
niobium/12,57
nisseøl/12,57
nittenhundredetal/12,57
nobelium/12,57
nyromantik/58,12
nødret/58,12
O/51
o/51
offset/58,12
oilskin/12,57
opalglas/12,57,32
opium/58,12,32
oprustningsvanvid/12,57
opspil/12,57
opspyt/12,57
orgelmusik/58,12
osmium/12,57,32
overtryk/12,57
P/51
p/51
pak/12,57,32
palladium/12,57,32
panik/58,12,32
pendultrafik/58,12
pensum/12,57,32
pep/12,57,32
persillesmør/12,57
personel/12,57,32
petroleum/58,12
pis/12,57
pjat/12,57,32
plet/12,57
plexiglas/12,57,32
plutonium/12,57,32
polyrytmik/58,12
Pommern/54,11
pop/58,12,32
pragmatik/58,12
propædeutik/58,12
psykosomatik/58,12
pus/12,57
q/51
r/51
råd/12,57,32
råderet/58,12
radium/12,57,32
råglas/12,57,32
ragnarok/12,57,32
rak/12,57
rakitis/58,12,32
rapmusik/58,12
regional-tv/51
regionalpolitik/58,12
reklame-TV/51
rentefradragsret/58,12
ret/58,12
revolverjournalistik/58,12
rom/58,12,32
ros/12,57
rubidium/12,57
rytmik/58,12
S/51
s/51
salep/58,12
samkvem/12,57
satellit-tv/51
schellak/58,12,32
senantik/58,12
senromantik/58,12
sevenbom/58,12
silicium/12,57,32
sjap/12,57
skak/58,12,32
skam/58,12,32
skibstrafik/58,12
skibsøl/12,57
skin/12,57,32
skole-tv/51
skraldgas/58,12,32
skræk/58,12,32
skueglas/12,57,32
skum/12,57,32
slam/12,57,32
slavistik/58,12
slid/12,57,32
slik/12,57,32
småbørnspædagogik/58,12
smog/58,12,32
smør/12,57,32
snot/12,57,32
socialpolitik/58,12
SOS/51
soulmusik/58,12,32
specialslalom/58,12,32
spermacet/12,57,32
spindehør/58,12,32
sprit/58,12,32
spyt/12,57,32
spæk/12,57,32
stampersonel/12,57,32
stangtennis/58,12,32
statsborgerret/58,12
statsret/58,12
storslalom/58,12,32
strontium/12,57,32
stuk/12,57,32
svagstrøm/58,12
symbolik/58,12,32
Syrien/54,11
søgræs/12,57,32
T/51
t/51
taffelmusik/58,12,32
talkum/12,57,32
tallium/12,57,32
tandsmør/12,57,32
tekst-tv/51
tektonik/58,12,32
telematik/58,12,32
tennis/58,12,32
termoglas/12,57,32
tetraklorkulstof/12,57,32
Thüringen/54,11
tidløn/58,12
tilsnit/12,57
tin/12,57,32
tis/12,57
tolvtonemusik/58,12
tragik/58,12
trolddom/58,12
tros/12,57,32
tungspat/58,12
tv/51
tyvepak/12,57
tørstof/12,57
tøsjap/12,57
U/51
u/51
udenomssnak/58,12
ug/51
ugræs/12,57
underlægningsmusik/58,12
uret/58,12,32
V/51
v/51
vanvid/12,57
ved/12,57,32
